Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 47.56.902 and 2023 c 377 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) For the purposes of this section and RCW 47.56.904 ((and 47.56.906)) and section 8, chapter 377, Laws of 2023, "Interstate 5 bridge replacement project" means the bistate, multimodal corridor improvement program between the state route number 500 interchange in Vancouver, Washington and the Victory Boulevard interchange in Portland, Oregon.(((2) The Interstate 5 bridge replacement project is designated an eligible toll facility. Tolls are authorized to be imposed on the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project. Tolls may be charged for travel only on the existing and replacement Interstate 5 Columbia river bridges. Tolls may not be charged for travel on the Washington state portion of Interstate 205. Toll revenue generated on the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project must be expended only as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 47.56.892 (Columbia river crossing projectâAgreements with the Oregon state transportation commission) and 2012 c 36 s 4;(2) RCW 47.56.906 (Interstate 5 bridge replacement projectâBistate agreement) and 2023 c 377 s 4; and(3) 2023 c 377 s 8 (uncodified).--- END ---